Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
General Provisions

257.480.
Legislative policy declared.

It is the legislative policy that every Kentucky citizen exert the maximum local effort to enforce the livestock, poultry, and fish disease control programs in KRS

257.010

to KRS

257.470

and provide protection to the citizens and livestock, poultry, and fish of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 244, § 1; 2009, ch. 22, § 17, effective June 25, 2009.

257.490.
Designation of employees as peace officers — Qualifications — Powers — Manual.

The Commissioner shall have the power to employ persons to serve as peace officers. All persons employed as peace officers by the department shall meet the qualifications set forth in KRS

15.380

to

15.404

concerning officer certification and training.

Officers employed by the department shall have full powers as peace officers and shall be limited to the enforcement of Department of Agriculture statutes and administrative regulations, except when it is necessary to enforce KRS Chapter 514 related to theft cases involving animals, KRS Chapter 516 related to forgery of animal health certificates, or KRS Chapter 525 related to animal cruelty, mistreatment, or torture.

The department shall establish and maintain an operational procedures manual outlining specific actions to be taken by officers pursuant to this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 244, § 2; 1978, ch. 296, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 2002, ch. 49, § 18, effective July 15, 2002; 2009, ch. 22, § 18, effective June 25, 2009.